fi: Rakentaminen > Putkityöt > Putkien kiinnitys ja osat > WC- ja bideetarvikkeet > WC-säiliöt: Painovoimasäiliöt; Paineavusteiset säiliöt
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Santechnika > Santechnikos įranga ir dalys > Tualeto ir bidė priedai > Tualeto bakeliai: Gravitaciniai bakeliai; Slėginiai bakeliai
nb: Maskinvare > Rørlegging > Utstyr og deler for rørmontering > Toalett- og bidettilbehør > Toalettanker: Tyngdekraftstanker; Trykkassisterte tanker
bg-BG: Железария > Водоснабдяване и канализация > Аксесоари и части за ВиК оборудване > Аксесоари за тоалетна и биде > Тоалетни казанчета: Стандартни тоалетни казанчета; Тоалетни казанчета с вградена помпа
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Prodotti idraulici > Ferramenta per la riparazione di impianti idraulici > Accessori WC e bidet > Vaschette per WC: Serbatoi alimentati per gravità; Serbatoi a pressione assistita
ko: 철물 > 배관 > 배관 시설 장비/부품 > 변기/비데 부대용품 > 변기 물탱크: 중력식 탱크; 압력식 탱크
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Υδραυλικές εγκαταστάσεις > Εξαρτήματα & ανταλλακτικά υδραυλικών ειδών > Αξεσουάρ τουαλέτας & μπιντέ > Λεκάνες τουαλέτας ( δοχεία αποχωρητηρίου): Λεκάνες βαρύτητας; Λεκάνες με υποβοήθηση πίεσης
hu: Hardver > Vízvezeték > Vízvezeték-szerelvény-hardver és -alkatrészek > WC- és bidékiegészítők > WC-tartályok: Gravitációs tartályok; Nyomástartós tartályok
hr-HR: Željezarija > Vodoinstalaterska oprema > Oprema i dijelovi za vodoinstalatersku opremu > Pribor za toalete i bidee > Vodokotlići: Gravitacijski vodokotlići; Vodokotlići potpomognuti tlakom
pt-PT: Equipamento > Canalização > Peças e equipamento de fixação de canalização > Acessórios de bidé e sanita > Depósitos de sanita: Tanques alimentados por gravidade; Tanques Assistidos por pressão
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > ระบบท่อประปา > ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนสำหรับงานท่อ > อุปกรณ์ส้วมและโถชำระล้าง > ถังน้ำของโถส้วม: ถังน้ำอาศัยแรงโน้มถ่วง; ถังน้ำใช้แรงดัน
ja: DIY用品 > 水道設備 > 配管固定具・パーツ > トイレ・ビデ関連用品 > トイレタンク: 重力式タンク; 圧力補助タンク
zh-TW: 硬體 > 管線 > 衛生器具和零件 > 馬桶和坐浴桶配件 > 馬桶水箱: 重力進水式水箱; 壓力輔助式水箱
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Vodoinstalace > Instalatérské potřeby a součástky > Záchody a bidety – příslušenství > WC nádržky: Gravitační nádrže; Přečerpávací nádrže
sk-SK: Náradie > Vodoinštalačné práce > Príslušenstvo a diely pre vodovodné armatúry > Príslušenstvo k toaletám a bidetom > WC nádrže: Nádrže poháňané gravitáciou; Nádrže s podporou tlaku
tr: Hırdavat > Sıhhi tesisat > Su Tahliye Teçhizatı ve Parçaları > Tuvalet ve Bide Aksesuarları > Klozet Rezervuarları: Yerçekimi Beslemeli Sifonlar; Basınç Destekli Sifonlar
pl: Sprzęt > Systemy hydrauliczne > Armatura wodociągowa i części > Akcesoria do toalet i bidetów > Spłuczki: Spłuczki grawitacyjne; Spłuczki ciśnieniowe
ro-RO: Feronerie > Instalații sanitare > Accesorii de feronerie și piese pentru instalații sanitare > Accesorii pentru toaletă și bideu > Rezervoare de toaletă: Rezervoare gravitaționale; Rezervoare cu presiune
en: Hardware > Plumbing > Plumbing Fixture Hardware & Parts > Toilet & Bidet Accessories > Toilet Tanks: Gravity-Fed Tanks; Pressure-Assisted Tanks
vi: Phần cứng > Đường ống > Bộ phận và phần cứng của thiết bị đường ống > Phụ kiện bồn cầu và bồn vệ sinh nữ > Bồn chứa nước: Bồn chứa nước tự chảy; Bồn chứa nước hỗ trợ áp suất
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Системы водоснабжения и водоотведения > Комплектующие и детали для сантехнического оборудования > Аксессуары для унитазов и биде > Сливные бачки для унитазов: Бачки со смывом самотеком; Бачки со смывом под давлением
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Loodgieterswerk > Onderdelen voor sanitair > Accessoires voor toilet en bidet > Toiletstortbakken: Stortbakken met zwaartekrachtvoeding; Stortbakken met drukondersteuning
es: Bricolaje > Fontanería > Piezas y herramientas para componentes de fontanería > Accesorios de baño y bidé > Cisternas del inodoro: Cisternas alimentadas por gravedad; Cisternas asistidas por presión
fr: Quincaillerie > Plomberie > Pièces et matériel de plomberie > Accessoires pour bidets et toilettes > Réservoirs de toilette: Réservoirs alimentés par gravité; Réservoirs assistés par pression
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 管道 > 水管装置和部件 > 马桶与坐浴盆配件 > 马桶水箱: 重力式水箱; 压力辅助水箱
sv: Metallprodukter > Rörmokeri > Vattenkransutrustning och -delar > Tillbehör till toaletter och bidéer > Toalettcisterner: Gravitationsmatade tankar; Tryckassisterade tankar
da: Isenkram > Sanitet > Dele til sanitære installationer > Toilet og bidet – tilbehør > Cisterner: Tyngdekraftstanke; Trykassisterede tanke
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Sanitär > Zubehör für sanitäre Anlagen > Toiletten- und Bidetzubehör > Spülkästen: Schwerkraftgespeiste Tanks; Druckunterstützte Tanks
pt-BR: Ferragens > Encanamento > Peças e ferragens para fixação de encanamento > Acessórios para vasos sanitários e bidês > Descargas de vaso sanitário: Descargas alimentadas por gravidade; Descargas assistidas por pressão
sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Vodovod > Strojna oprema in deli za vodovodne napeljave > Dodatki za stranišča in bideje > Kotlički za stranišče: Gravitacijski kotlički; Kotlički pod pritiskom